tr: Perküsyon standı tasarımı: Montaj; Raf; Diğer
ro-RO: Design stativ pentru percuție: Stativ; Suport; Altele
bg-BG: Дизайн на стойка за перкусии: Монтаж; Стойка; Други
sv: Utförande av slagverksstativ: Fäste; Kuggstång; Övrigt
pt-BR: Formato do suporte para percussão: Montagem; Prateleira; Outro
th: การออกแบบขาตั้งเครื่องเคาะจังหวะ: แบบยึด; ขายึดในตู้; อื่นๆ
ru: Конструкция стойки для ударных инструментов: Крепление; Стойка; Другое
en: Percussion stand design: Mount; Rack; Other
zh-TW: 打擊樂器立架設計: 底座; 貨架; 其他
it: Design dello stand per percussioni: Staffa; Scaffale; Altro
fr: Conception du support de percussion: Monture; Support; Autre
cs: Konstrukce stojanu pro perkuse: Držák; Regál; Jiné
nb: Perkusjon-stativdesign: Feste; Stativ; Annet
ko: 타악기 스탠드 디자인: 마운트; 랙; 기타
el: Σχεδιασμός βάσης κρουστών: Στήριγμα; Rack; Άλλο
zh-CN: 打击架设计: 底座; 架子; 其他
ja: パーカッションスタンドの種類: マウント; ラック; その他
de: Design des Schlaginstrumentständers: Befestigung; Gestell; Sonstiges
hu: Ütőhangszerállvány kialakítása: Keret; Állvány; Egyéb
da: Percussionstativdesign: Montering; Rack; Andet
es: Diseño de la base para percusión: Montura; Bastidor; Otros
pl: Projekt statywu perkusyjnego: Montaż; Regał; Inne
hr-HR: Dizajn stalka za perkusije: Zidni; Stalak; Ostalo
pt-PT: Design de suporte de percussão: Suporte de montagem; Estante; Outro
sl-SI: Zasnova stojala za tolkala: Stojalo; Stojalo; Drugo
fi: Lyömäsoitintelineen muotoilu: Kiinnike; Teline; Muu
vi: Thiết kế giá đỡ bộ gõ: Gắn; Giá kệ; Khác
sk-SK: Dizajn stojana na bicie nástroje: Montážny stojan; Stojan; Iné
nl: Ontwerp standaard percussie-instrument: Beugel; Rack; Andere
lt-LT: Mušamųjų instrumentų vertikalių stovo dizainas: Tvirtinamas; Pastatomas; Kita